Massachusetts, session 194th, H3031.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13T of Chapter 23A is hereby amended in the first paragraph by adding at the
end thereof the following: “; and 2.5% of the state’s room occupancy excise from the prior fiscal
year.”
of 1